Nebraska, session 109, LB742.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB742 LB742
2026 2026
Section 1. (1)(a) Beginning with the 2026-27 school year, each
school board and each governing authority of an approved or accredited
private, denominational, or parochial high school shall develop and adopt
a policy that allows a student in seventh or eighth grade to participate
and compete in the high school athletic program under the following
conditions as verified by the principal and athletic director of the high
school:
(i) The student possesses the appropriate skill level as approved by
the appropriate coach or athletic director at such school on a sport-
specific level with additional scrutiny given in relation to skill and
safety if the student is requesting to participate or compete in a high
school contact sport;
(ii) The student has had a documented physical or evaluation by a
health care professional to ensure safe participation with additional
scrutiny given if the student is requesting to participate and compete in
a high school contact sport;
(iii) The student has provided written consent from the student's
parent, legal guardian, or educational decisionmaker as defined in
section 79-530; and
(iv) Such participation by a seventh or eighth grade student in the
high school sport requested is not prohibited by an athletic association
such school is a member of, any state or federal law, or any rules and
regulations adopted and promulgated by the State Board of Education.
(b) A student authorized to participate or compete in a high school
sport pursuant to this section shall no longer be eligible to participate
in such sport at the seventh or eighth grade level.
(2) A student's participation in a high school sport pursuant to
this section shall not impact the student's eligibility to participate or
compete in such sport while the student is in high school.
(3) The State Board of Education may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out this section.
-2-

LB742 LB742
2026 2026
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-3-